Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4284.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 901 of Title 4, unless there is
created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Oklahoma
Animal Abuse Offender Registry Act".
Req. No. 15237 Page 1

B. There is hereby created within the Oklahoma State Bureau of
Investigation a registry of persons who, after November 1, 2026,
have been convicted, whether upon a verdict or plea of guilty or a
plea of nolo contendere, or received a suspended sentence or any
deferred or probationary term, or are currently serving a sentence
or any form of probation or parole for a crime or attempt to commit
a crime in violation of:
1. Section 1680.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
2. Section 1681 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
3. Section 1682 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
4. Section 1683 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
5. Section 1685 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
6. Section 1685.1 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
7. Section 1686 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
8. Section 1688 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
9. Section 1689 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
10. Section 1691 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes;
11. Sections 1692.1 through 1692.9 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes;
12. Sections 1693 through 1699.2 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma
Statutes; and
13. Section 1700 of Title 21 of the Oklahoma Statutes.
C. The registry created in subsection B of this section shall
be maintained by the Bureau.
Req. No. 15237 Page 2

D. The registry shall consist of the following information:
1. Name and address of the person;
2. Date of birth of the person;
3. The offense or offenses which made the person eligible for
inclusion on the registry;
4. The date of conviction or the date that a plea of guilty or
nolo contendere was accepted by the court for any violation of an
offense provided for in subsection B of this section;
5. The county where the offense or offenses occurred; and
6. Such other identifying data as the Bureau determines is
necessary to properly identify the person.
E. Beginning November 1, 2026, all district court clerks shall
forward a copy of the judgment and sentence or other applicable
information relating to the disposition of the criminal case and
date of birth of all persons who are subject to the provisions of
the Oklahoma Animal Abuse Offender Registry Act for a violation of
the offenses described in subsection B of this section to the
Bureau. The information shall be sent in an electronic format in a
manner prescribed by the Bureau within thirty (30) days of the date
of final disposition of the case.
F. 1. Upon a person's first conviction of a violation of any
of the offenses described in subsection B of this section, the
Bureau shall maintain on the animal abuse offender registry the name
and other identifying information of the person for two (2) years
Req. No. 15237 Page 3

afte r the date of the most recent judgment and sentence, after which
time the Bureau shall remove the person's name and other identifying
information from the list, provided the person is not convicted of
another violation of any of the offenses described in subsection B
of this section during the two-year period.
2. Upon a person's subsequent conviction of a violation of any
of the offenses described in subsection B of this section, the
Bureau shall maintain on the animal abuse offender registry the name
and other identifying information of the person for five (5) years
after the date of the most recent judgment and sentence, after which
time the Bureau shall remove the person's name and other identifying
information from the list, provided the person is not convicted of
another violation of any of the offenses described in subsection B
of this section during the five-year period.
3. Any person having received a deferred sentence that expires
prior to the time limitations provided in this subsection may apply
to the Bureau to be removed from the registry upon the completion of
the deferred sentence by providing to the Bureau a certified copy of
the dismissal of the case by certified mail. The Bureau may remove
the person from the animal abuse offender registry upon expiration
of the deferred sentence.
G. On or prior to November 1, 2027, the Oklahoma State Bureau
of Investigation shall maintain an animal abuse offender registry
website available for viewing by the public.
Req. No. 15237 Page 4

H. The Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation shall take
necessary actions through the promulgation of rules and cooperation
with the courts to ensure that notice of the provisions of this
section is provided to those persons subject to the animal abuse
offender registry as listed in subsection B of this section.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1685, as
amended by Section 165, Chapter 486, O.S.L. 2025 (21 O.S. Supp.
2025, Section 1685), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1685. Any person who shall willfully or maliciously
torture, destroy or kill, or cruelly beat or injure, maim or
mutilate any animal in subjugation or captivity, whether wild or
tame, and whether belonging to the person or to another, or deprive
any such animal of necessary food, drink, shelter, or veterinary
care to prevent suffering; or who shall cause, procure or permit any
such animal to be so tortured, destroyed or killed, or cruelly
beaten or injured, maimed or mutilated, or deprived of necessary
food, drink, shelter, or veterinary care to prevent suffering; or
who shall willfully set on foot, instigate, engage in, or in any way
further any act of cruelty to any animal, or any act tending to
produce such cruelty, shall be guilty of a Class B5 felony offense
and shall be punished by imprisonment in the State Penitentiary not
exceeding five (5) ten (10) years, or by imprisonment in the county
jail not exceeding one (1) year, or by a fine not exceeding Five
Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) Ten Thousand ($10,000.00) Dollars, or
Req. No. 15237 Page 5

both . Any animal so maltreated or abused shall be considered an
abused or neglected animal.
SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-15237 JL 01/12/26



















Req. No. 15237 Page 6